Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/kk.aff
SFX m N 51
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX m у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX m у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]му
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]су
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX m у ып [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX m ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX m ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX N N 51
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX N у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX N у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]му
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]су
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX N у ып [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX N ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX N ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX n N 51
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX n у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX n у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]му
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]су
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX n у ып [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX n ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX n ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX O N 51
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX O у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX O у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]му
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]су
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX O у ып [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX O ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX O ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX o N 51
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX o у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX o у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]му
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]су
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX o у ып [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX o ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX o ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX P N 51
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX P у іп [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX P у п [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]у
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]му
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]су
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX P у ып [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX P ю йіп [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX P ю йып [аоуұыэ]ю
